North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-21 Curriculum and Testing
15.1-21-02.10.
North Dakota scholarship.

Any resident student who meets the requirements of section 15.1-21-02.6 is eligible to receive a North Dakota scholarship if the student:

Completed an individual consultative process or a nine-week course under subsection 2 of section 15.1-21-18;

Completed the civics test under section 15.1-21-27;

Completed a four-year rolling plan, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction;

Obtained a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 grading scale, or an equivalent course proficiency score if the student was enrolled in a school district participating in an approved innovative education program under section 15.1-06-08.2 and the school district obtained a waiver under section 15.1-06-08.1;

Completed the requirements in at least four of the following while enrolled in grades nine through twelve:

Twenty-five hours of community service;

A ninety-five percent attendance rate as determined under section 15.1-20-02.1, not including any school-related absences;

A career exploration experience, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction;

At least two years in organized cocurricular activities;

At least two years in organized extracurricular activities;

A capstone project, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction;

An online learning course; and

Successful demonstration of competency in twenty-first century skills, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction; and

Completed the requirements in two of the following subdivisions while enrolled in grades nine through twelve:

Received:

A composite score of at least twenty-four on an ACT; or

A score of at least 1180 on an SAT; and

Completed the requirements in at least two of the following:

A grade of at least “C” in an advanced placement course, or an equivalent course proficiency score;

A grade of at least “C” in a dual-credit English or mathematics course, or an equivalent course proficiency score;

A grade of at least “C” in one unit of algebra II, or an equivalent course proficiency score;

A score of at least three on an advanced placement examination;

A score of at least four on an international baccalaureate examination; and

A cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 grading scale, or an equivalent course proficiency score if the student was enrolled in a school district participating in an approved innovative education program under section 15.1-06-08.2 and the school district obtained a waiver under section 15.1-06-08.1, in core courses required for admission to institutions of higher education under the control of the state board of higher education;

Earned four units of career and technical education, including two units from a coordinated plan of study recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction;

Received:

A composite score of at least twenty-four on an ACT; or

A score of at least five on each of three WorkKeys assessments recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction; and

Successfully completed the requirements in at least two of the following:

A career-ready practices course developed and recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction;

A grade of at least “C” in a dual-credit course, or an equivalent course proficiency score;

A technical assessment or industry credential, as determined by the department of career and technical education;

Forty hours in a workplace learning experience, approved by the superintendent of public instruction;

Forty hours in a work-based learning experience aligned to the Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act [Pub. L. 115-224; 132 Stat. 1563; 20 U.S.C. 2301 et seq.]; and

Received:

A score of at least three on a reading and mathematics assessment administered under subsection 1 of section 15.1-21-08 while enrolled in grades nine through twelve; or

ACT scores of at least nineteen in English and at least twenty-two in mathematics if the school in which the student was enrolled used an ACT assessment for accountability; or

Received:

Obtained a grade of at least “C” in a physical education course, or an equivalent course proficiency score; and

Completed any two of subparagraphs a through f of paragraph 2 of subdivision a, or any two of subparagraphs a through f of paragraph 3 of subdivision b.

(a)

A score of at least thirty-one on an ASVAB test and successfully completed basic training in one of the branches of the United States military; or

(b)

A score of at least eighty-five on an ASVAB test;

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 159, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-03.
High school unit — Instructional time.

Except as provided in subsection 2, each unit must consist of at least one hundred twenty hours of student engagement per school calendar.

The following units must consist of at least one hundred fifty hours of student engagement per school calendar: natural sciences, agriculture, business and office technology, marketing, diversified occupations, trade and industrial education, technology education, and health careers.

The hour requirements of this section are subject to reductions resulting from the holidays and nonstudent contact days provided for in section 15.1-06-04.

This section does not apply to schools or school districts having block schedules approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

This section does not apply to units attained from a district-approved mastery framework under section 15.1-21-03.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 8; 2003, ch. 161, § 1; 2019, ch. 149, § 6, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 136, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-04.
Minimum high school courses — Alternative curriculum plans.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, each student shall enroll in at least four units of high school work in each grade from nine through twelve.

A student in grade twelve may enroll in fewer than four units of work, provided:

The student requires fewer than four units of work for graduation; and

The board of the school district has adopted an alternative high school senior curriculum plan.

An alternative high school senior curriculum plan becomes effective if:

It is adopted by action of the school board;

It contains specific criteria under which a high school senior may enroll in fewer than four units of work; and

It has been submitted to and approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 8.

Collateral References.

Releasing public school pupils from attendance for purpose of attending religious education classes, 2 A.L.R.2d 1371.

15.1-21-05.
Indian education curriculum.

The superintendent of public instruction may develop an Indian education curriculum to be implemented within the minimum curriculum requirements for elementary and secondary schools. The superintendent shall provide for continuing research and evaluation and for inservice training necessary to implement an Indian education curriculum.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 8.

15.1-21-05.1.
Curriculum — Critical race theory — Prohibited.

Each school district and public school shall ensure instruction of its curriculum is factual, objective, and aligned to the kindergarten through grade twelve state content standards. A school district or public school may not include instruction relating to critical race theory in any portion of the district’s required curriculum under sections 15.1-21-01 or 15.1-21-02, or any other curriculum offered by the district or school. For purposes of this section, “critical race theory” means the theory that racism is not merely the product of learned individual bias or prejudice, but that racism is systemically embedded in American society and the American legal system to facilitate racial inequality. The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to govern this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 554, § 1, effective November 12, 2021.

15.1-21-06.
Goals 2000 — Participation voluntary. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 8; repealed by 2021, ch. 139, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-07.
School-to-work — Student participation voluntary.

Before an elementary or secondary school student may participate in any course, program, or project offered under the auspices of the School-to-Work Opportunities Act of 1994 [Pub. L. 103-239; 108 Stat. 568; 20 U.S.C. 2394 et seq.], the student’s school principal shall obtain the written consent of the student’s parent or legal guardian. Participation by a student is voluntary and may not be deemed a condition of graduation. Neither school personnel, school district personnel, nor the superintendent of public instruction may impose any academic penalties or any other sanctions on a student for failure to participate. A student’s participation in a course, program, or project offered under the auspices of the School-to-Work Opportunities Act of 1994 is subject to all state and federal child labor laws.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 8.

15.1-21-08.
Reading, mathematics, and science — Administration of test.

The superintendent of public instruction shall administer to public school students a test that is aligned to the state content and achievement standards in reading and mathematics. This test must be administered annually to all public school students in grades three, four, five, six, seven, eight, and in at least one grade level selected from nine through twelve.

The superintendent of public instruction shall administer a test that is aligned to the state content and achievement standards in science. This test must be administered to all public school students in at least one grade level selected from three through five, in at least one grade level selected from six through nine, and in at least one grade level selected from ten through twelve.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 190, § 8; 2003, ch. 162, § 1; 2011, ch. 147, § 15; 2013, ch. 158, § 1; 2017, ch. 144, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

15.1-21-08.1.
Parental directive — Administration of tests and assessments — Report.

A student’s parent may direct the school district in which the student is enrolled not to administer to the student any state test or state assessment required in accordance with section 15.1-21-08.

In addition to the authority granted under subsection 1, a student’s parent may direct that the school district in which the student is enrolled not administer any other specific test or assessment to the student, except a parental directive under this subsection does not apply to:

Any test or assessment required by the student’s school district of enrollment or this state for the completion of any grade from kindergarten through twelve; or

Any test or assessment required by the student’s school district of enrollment or this state for high school graduation.

A parental directive is valid only if it is presented to the school district using a standardized form, prepared by the superintendent of public instruction, and signed by the student’s custodial parent.

A parental directive is valid only until the conclusion of the school year in which it is received by the school district.

A parental directive submitted to a school district in accordance with this section must be retained as part of the student’s educational record.

A school district is not liable for any consequences incurred by a student as a result of a parental directive submitted in accordance with this section.

A school district is not required to provide instruction or activities for a student during the administration of any test or assessment referenced in the parental directive submitted by the student’s parent.

Each school district shall post the parental directive form on its website and make the form available to a parent, upon request.

At the time and in the manner directed by the superintendent of public instruction, each school district shall provide a report regarding:

The number of parental directives received;

The number of parental directives applicable to students who are economically disadvantaged, students from major racial and ethnic groups, students with disabilities, and students with limited English proficiency; and

Any loss of funding stemming from the parental directives.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 145, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 158, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-09.
Test scores — Compilation.

The superintendent of public instruction shall arrange for the compilation of test scores in a manner that indicates achievement and allows a comparison of individual students, classrooms within a given school and school district, schools within the state, and school districts within the state. The test scores must also allow for comparisons based on students’ gender, ethnicity, economic status, service status, and assessment status, unless doing so enables the identification of any student.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 190, § 9.

15.1-21-10.
Test scores — Publication.

Upon receiving notice that the compilation of test scores has been completed, the superintendent of public instruction shall inform the legislative council. The superintendent shall present the test scores publicly for the first time at a meeting of a legislative committee designated by the legislative management. At the meeting, the superintendent and representatives of the testing service that created the tests shall provide detailed testimony regarding the testing instrument, the methodology used to test and assess the students, the established cut scores, the methodology used to determine the cut scores, the validation of all test products, and the significance of the test scores.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 190, § 10; 2003, ch. 162, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 13.

15.1-21-11.
Superintendent of public instruction — Review of test questions.

The superintendent of public instruction shall require that the entity developing a test to be administered under section 15.1-21-08 not include questions that might be deemed personal to a student or to the student’s family and that the entity developing the test not include questions requiring responses that might be deemed personal to a student or to the student’s family. Before a test is finalized for use in this state, the superintendent shall require that the test be reviewed by a standards alignment committee appointed by the superintendent to ensure that the test meets the requirements of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 190, § 11.

15.1-21-12.
Professional development — Use of available funds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 190, § 12; 2003, ch. 163, § 1; repealed by 2021, ch. 139, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-12.1.
Reading curriculum — Content — Professional development — Reports to legislative management.

Beginning July 1, 2022, each school district and nonpublic school shall ensure the portion of its curriculum which is related to reading:

Is scientifically based, evidence based, and research based;

Focuses on:

Phonemic awareness;

Phonics;

Fluency;

Vocabulary; and

Comprehension; and

Uses systematic direct instruction for students in kindergarten through grade three to ensure all students obtain necessary early reading skills.

Before the 2022-23 school year, each teacher who teaches kindergarten through grade three at a school district or nonpublic school, and each principal of a public or nonpublic school with kindergarten through grade three, shall attend teacher-approved, professional development training that includes training in the topics provided under subsection 1.

Each teacher or principal hired by a school district or nonpublic school that provides instruction in kindergarten through grade three shall complete the training under subsection 2, or demonstrate mastery of the topics provided under subsection 1, within one year of the teacher's or principal's first year of placement in the grade level or at the school.

To be approved by the superintendent of public instruction, each public and nonpublic school shall certify to the superintendent of public instruction that the district or school:

Ensures the placement of highly effective teachers in kindergarten through grade three;

Has integrated reading instruments used to diagnose reading development and comprehension; and

Has integrated evidence-based resources to support reading development and comprehension.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide ongoing assistance to school districts and nonpublic schools to be in and maintain compliance with this section.

The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the kindergarten through grade twelve education coordination council, shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules to monitor implementation and compliance with this section.

The superintendent of public instruction shall provide periodic reports to the legislative management on the implementation and effectiveness of this section in improving educational outcomes and reading competency of students.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 141, § 9, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-13.
Content standards — Translation — Curriculum.

Each district shall provide upon request a copy of its content standards in the areas of reading and mathematics, a translation of the district’s content standards in the areas of reading and mathematics for individuals who do not have a background in elementary or high school education, and a copy of the curriculum or syllabus used by each teacher of reading and mathematics.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 190, § 13.

15.1-21-14.
Test — Availability for viewing.

Upon request, a school district must allow any individual over the age of twenty to view any test administered under sections 15.1-21-08 through this section as soon as the test is in the possession of the school district.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 190, § 14.

15.1-21-15.
Electronic course delivery — Approval process. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 178, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 146, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

15.1-21-16.
Summer school courses and programs — Eligibility for payment.

The summer school courses and programs for which a school district may receive payment as provided in section 15.1-27-19 are:

Mathematics provided to students enrolled in any grade from kindergarten through eight;

Reading provided to students enrolled in any grade from kindergarten through eight;

Social studies provided to students enrolled in any grade from five through eight; and

Any other high school summer courses that satisfy requirements for graduation, comprise at least as many clock-hours as courses offered during the regular school term, and comply with rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.

Science provided to students enrolled in any grade from five through eight; and

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 21; 2021, ch. 160, § 1, effective April 13, 2021.

15.1-21-17.
Interim assessment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 22; repealed by 2021, ch. 158, § 9, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-18.
Career interest inventory — Educational and career planning — Consultation.

A school district shall administer to students, once during their enrollment in grade seven or eight and once during their enrollment in grade nine or ten, a career interest inventory recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

At least once during the seventh or eighth grade, each school district shall arrange for students to participate in either an individual consultative process or a nine-week course, for the purpose of discussing the results of their career interest inventory, selecting high school courses appropriate to their educational pursuits and career interests, and developing individual high school education plans.

Each school district shall notify its high school students that, upon request, a student is entitled to receive a consultative review of the student’s individual high school education plan at least once during each high school grade. Upon the request of a student, the school district shall provide the consultative review.

Each school district shall verify compliance with the requirements of this section at the time and in the manner required by the superintendent of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 23; 2011, ch. 147, § 16.

15.1-21-19.
Summative assessment — Selection — Cost — Exemptions.

Except as otherwise provided, each public and nonpublic school student in grade eleven may take:

The ACT or an equivalent nationally recognized standardized test approved by the state board of higher education, including the writing test; or

Three WorkKeys assessments or an equivalent nationally recognized standardized test, recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

The student’s career advisor or guidance counselor shall meet with the student to review the student’s assessment results.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 24; 2011, ch. 147, § 17; 2021, ch. 158, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-20.
Summative assessment — General educational development diploma — Selection — Cost.

Except as otherwise provided, each student pursuing a general educational development diploma may take:

The ACT or an equivalent nationally recognized standardized test approved by the state board of higher education; or

Three WorkKeys assessments or an equivalent nationally recognized standardized test, recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

The student’s career advisor or guidance counselor shall meet with the student to review the student’s assessment results.

This section is applicable only to a student who has not reached the age of twenty-one before August first of the year of enrollment.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 25; 2021, ch. 158, § 8, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-21.
Concepts of personal finance — Inclusion in curriculum.

Beginning July 1, 2010, each school district shall ensure that its curriculum for either economics or problems of democracy includes the exposure of students to concepts of personal finance, including:

Checkbook mechanics, including writing checks, balancing, and statement reconciliation;

Saving for larger purchases;

Credit, including credit card usage, interest, and fees;

Earning power, including jobs for teenagers;

Taxation and paycheck withholdings;

College costs;

Making and living within a budget; and

Mortgages, retirement savings, and investments.

Upon written request, the superintendent of public instruction may allow a school district annually to select courses other than economics or problems of democracy for purposes of exposing students to the concepts of personal finance, as listed in this section, provided the school district can demonstrate that the number of students exposed to the concepts in the other selected courses would meet or exceed the number of students exposed under the requirements of subsection 1.

The requirements of this section may be provided by the regular classroom teacher of the course in which the concepts of personal finance are incorporated.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 26.

15.1-21-22.
Required reading of historical documents.

Before a student is deemed to have successfully completed either United States government or problems of democracy, as required by section 15.1-21-02.1, the student’s school district shall ensure that the student has read the Declaration of Independence, the United States Constitution, and the Bill of Rights.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 27.

15.1-21-23.
Readiness testing and formative assessments — Kindergarten students — School calendar.

A school district may conduct readiness testing and formative assessments of incoming kindergarten students. The dates on which the testing and assessments are scheduled may be within the regular school calendar or before the regular school calendar. The school district shall provide to the parents of each incoming kindergarten student the date and time of the student’s testing or assessment.

A district may consider up to two of the days set aside for readiness testing and formative assessments to be kindergarten instructional days for purposes of section 15.1-06-04. However, the attendance of a kindergarten student on those days is limited to the period of time during which the individual student’s testing or assessment is scheduled.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 144, § 1.

15.1-21-24.
Health curriculum — Content.

Beginning July 1, 2012, each school district and nonpublic school shall ensure that the portion of its health curriculum which is related to sexual health includes instruction pertaining to the risks associated with adolescent sexual activity and the social, psychological, and physical health gains to be realized by abstaining from sexual activity before and outside of marriage.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 145, § 1.

15.1-21-25.
High school graduation — Minimum requirements.

Redesignated as section 15.1-21-02.2.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 10.

15.1-21-26.
Driver education curriculum — Content — Anatomical gift.

Beginning July 1, 2014, each school district shall ensure that its curriculum for driver education includes information regarding the manner in which a student obtaining a driver’s license may make an anatomical gift, as provided for in section 23-06.6-04.

The school district shall provide notification of the curricular requirement set forth in subsection 1 to the parent of each student enrolled in driver education. The notification may be provided electronically or in written form.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 159, §
1.

15.1-21-27.
High school graduation requirement — Civics test.

For purposes of this section, “civics test” means the one hundred questions that, as of January 1, 2015, officers of the United States citizenship and immigration services use as the basis for selecting the questions posed to applicants for naturalization, in order that the applicants can demonstrate a knowledge and understanding of the fundamentals of United States history and the principles and form of United States government, as required by 8 U.S.C. 1423.

If a student is enrolled in the twelfth grade during the 2016-17 school year, that student must, as a condition of receiving a high school diploma, correctly answer at least sixty percent of the questions on the civics test.

Before any other student may be awarded a high school diploma, that student must correctly answer at least seventy percent of the questions on the civics test.

The requirement set forth in this section applies to each student who is:

Enrolled in a public school district;

Enrolled in a nonpublic school;

Enrolled in the center for distance education;

Receiving home education if the student is to be issued a high school diploma in accordance with subsection 1 of section 15.1-23-17; or

Pursuing a general equivalency diploma.

A student may be exempted from the requirement of this section by the provisions of the student’s individualized education program plan.

The superintendent of public instruction shall, upon request, provide to the person administering the civics test the correct answer or acceptable answers to each question.

A student may take the test, in whole or in part, at any time after enrolling in grade seven and may repeat the test, or any portion thereof, as often as necessary to demonstrate proficiency.

Neither the superintendent of public instruction nor a school district may impose or collect any fees or charges in connection with this section.

This section is applicable to any student who graduates from high school during or after the 2016-17 school year.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 152, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.